apertium-sme-nob.sme.lexc
LEXICON BOHCCU
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Ped:jn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd K ;
 +PlGenCmp:jd R ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:jd%> Px1C ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Ill:jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:jdasa%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:jn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:j%- ENDLEX ;  !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com+Use/Ped:jd%> PxPlComC ;

LEXICON VUDDJI-
 BOHCCOadj ;
 BOHCCUadj ;

LEXICON BOHCCOadj
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub: PxV2 ;
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub: PxV2 ;
 +SgGenCmp: R ; 		! Already in LEXICON BOAZU
 +Sg+Acc: K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub: PxV2 ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:s%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Loc:s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:st%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:k K ; ! !Skániid dialect

LEXICON BOHCCUadj
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:jn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd K ;
 +PlGenCmp:jd R ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:jd%> Px1C ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Ill:jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:jdasa%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:jn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:j%- ENDLEX ;  !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:jd%> PxPlComC ;






! Adjective declension
! - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON ATTR ! This is the normal lexicon for ATTR forms
         K ;                  ! Plain attributive
         Rreal ;
 +Use/NG: VUOHTA ; ! ! Nielsen p. 212: vuottâ føiet til _nominativ_formen av adjektiver
! -:#%- ProperNoun ;   !Already i LEXICON R   !^C^
 #:»# NAMAT ; ! comp-only adj                       ! Added #
 #+Use/Circ:»# ALIT ; ! both comp and independent adj ! 

LEXICON ATTRCONT ! This lexicon is for forms with non-sub Attr, where we sub the rest.
 +Attr:%> K ;  ! Comp are also Attr.
 +Use/Sub: Rreal ;    
 #+Use/Sub:»# NAMAT ; ! comp-only adj
 #+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:»# ALIT ;  ! both comp and independent adj




LEXICON LAIKI0    ! Directing adjectives ...
 DEVNVCASE ;      ! ... to bisyllabic nominal declension
 VUOHTA ;         ! ... to A > N -vuohta derivation



LEXICON JOHTOLAT
! +Der4+Der/geahtes+A+Attr:»#geahtes K ; !This is not right
 @C.NeedNoun@ HEANDARAT-COMM ;
! The flag is there because verbs are derived via +Der/us suffix to
! JOHTOLAT, and then pick up their +N tag in HEANDARAT-COMM, but not
! via +Der/geahtes.

LEXICON JOHTOLAT0
 +Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +SgNomCmp:%> R ;			! test this
 +SgGenCmp:%> R ;
! +Sg+Nom@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@:%>X7@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@ R ;   ! removed since cons-final.
! +Sg+Nom@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@:%>@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@ R ;   ! removed since cons-final.
! +Sg+Gen:%> K ;
! +Sg+Acc:%> K ;
! This must be a typo!


LEXICON JOHTOLAHKA-
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:%> Px3V ;
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Ess+Use/Ped:n%> PxC ;
 :X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 :X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +Use/Sub: GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
 +SgGenCmp+Use/Sub:X4 R ; ! !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:X4 Px3V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Ped:X4 Px3V ;
 +Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Ped:X4st%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:X4k K ;
 +Use/Sub:X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +Use/Sub:X8 GOADE- ; !  ! Ditto (?)



LEXICON ISSORASSA-
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub: PxV ; ! ! tentative.
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Ess+Use/Sub:n%> PxC ; ! ! tentative, check.
 :X4 BU/MUS ;  
 HEAPMIOBL ;


LEXICON EABBO/EAMOS
 ADVC ;
 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
 
LEXICON EABBO/EAMOS_NVD
 ADVC ;
 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT_NVD ;


LEXICON EABBO/EAMOS_CONT
 +Comp+Dial/%-GG:at SHORTCOMP_PREDNVD ; ! 
 +Comp+Use/NG:it SHORTCOMP_NVD ; ! !In use in Gg, not in Kj. Not generated
 +Comp+Dial/%-KJ:et SHORTCOMP_PREDNVD ;
 +Comp+Use/NG:ut SHORTCOMP_NVD ; ! !In use in Kj, not in Gg. Not generated
 +Comp+Use/Sub+Dial/%-KJ:eabbu EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Not standard. 
 +Comp+Dial/%-KJ:eabbo EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Standard. 
 +Comp+Dial/%-GG:ab'bo EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Standard.   
 +Comp+Use/Sub+Dial/%-GG:ab'bu EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Not standard. 
 +Superl+Dial/%-GG:amos EAMOS ; !  
 +Superl+Dial/%-KJ:eapmo7s EAMOS ; ! 
 +Superl+Use/Sub:eapmus EAMOS ;

LEXICON EABBO/EAMOS_CONT_NVD
 +Comp+Dial/%-GG:at SHORTCOMP_NVD ; ! 
 +Comp+Use/NG:it SHORTCOMP_NVD ; ! !In use in Gg, not in Kj. Not generated
 +Comp+Dial/%-KJ:et SHORTCOMP_NVD ;
 +Comp+Use/NG:ut SHORTCOMP_NVD ; ! !In use in Kj, not in Gg. Not generated
 +Comp+Use/Sub+Dial/%-KJ:eabbu EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Not standard. 
 +Comp+Dial/%-KJ:eabbo EABBU_NVD ;  ! Parallel form. Standard. 
 +Comp+Dial/%-GG:ab'bo EABBU_NVD ;  ! Parallel form. Standard.   
 +Comp+Use/Sub+Dial/%-GG:ab'bu EABBU_NVD ;  ! Parallel form. Not standard. 
 +Superl+Dial/%-GG:amos EAMOS_NVD ; !  
 +Superl+Dial/%-KJ:eapmo7s EAMOS_NVD ; ! 
 +Superl+Use/Sub:eapmus EAMOS_NVD ;


LEXICON EAMOS_NVD
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NVD+Use/NG:%>X4 K ;
 +Ess:%>X4in K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2 PxC ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>X2a K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X2 K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2 PxC ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X2a K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:%>X2 K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2 PxC ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/NVD+Use/NG:%>X2at K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2asa%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2ijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>X2ij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:%>X2is K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X2in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:%>X2ijn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:%>X2ijnna K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>X2ijd K ;
 +PlGenCmp:%>X2ijd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>X2ijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>X2ijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>X2ijn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X2ijnna K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X2ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Com:%>X2ijgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%>X2ij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2istti%> PxV ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2ijnni%> PxV ;
! +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:%>X2ijddi%> PxV ; !^P^ !MARG
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2ijddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2ijddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2ijddás%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2ijnni%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;
 :%>X2 ADVC ;
 +Attr+Use/NVD+Use/NG:%>X4 K ; ! Attributive superaltives



LEXICON EABBO/EAMOS_CONT-contracted 
 +Comp+Dial/%-GG:at SHORTCOMP ; !  
! +Comp+Use/NG:it SHORTCOMP ; !  !In use in Gg, not in Kj. Not generated
! +Comp+Use/NG:et SHORTCOMP ; !   
 +Comp+Use/NG:ut SHORTCOMP_NVD ; !  !In use in Kj, not in Gg. Not generated
! +Comp+Use/Sub+Use/NG+Dial/%-KJ:eabbu EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Not standard. 
! +Comp+Use/NG+Dial/%-KJ:eabbo EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Standard. 
 +Comp+Use/NG:ab'bo EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Standard.  ! OBS
 +Comp+Use/Sub+Dial/%-GG:ab'bu EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Not standard. 
 +Superl+Dial/%-GG:amos EAMOS ; ! 
! +Superl+Use/NG:eapmo7s EAMOS ;
! +Superl+Use/Sub+Use/NG:eapmus EAMOS ;

LEXICON SHORTCOMP
 +Sg+Nom+Dial/%-GG:%> K ; ! 
 ATTRCONT ;

LEXICON SHORTCOMP_NVD
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NVD+Use/NG:%> K ; ! 
 +Attr+Use/NVD+Use/NG:%> K ;  ! Comp are also Attr.
 +Use/Sub: Rreal ;    

LEXICON SHORTCOMP_PREDNVD
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NVD+Use/NG:%> K ; ! 
 ATTRCONT ;

LEXICON Noun
aládas:aládass JOHTOLAT "*** N" ;
asto#áigge#opmodat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Build:asto#áigge#opmodah'k JOHTOLAT ;
bajimus#mearridan#gáibádus:bajimus#mearridan#gáibáduss JOHTOLAT ;
bargiid#lihkadus:bargiid9#lihkaduss JOHTOLAT ;
bargo#vásihus:bargo#vásihuss JOHTOLAT ;
beaivvádat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Wthr:beaivvádah'k JOHTOLAT ;
beallje#návhllahat:beallje#návhllahah'k JOHTOLAT ;
beavde#girje#lasáhus:beavde#girje#lasáhuss JOHTOLAT ;
biehttalan#vuođustus:biehttalan#vuođustuss JOHTOLAT ;
bijahas:bijahass JOHTOLAT ;
birra#čuohpahus+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:birra#čuohpahuss JOHTOLAT ;
blankeahtta#ráŋggáštus:blankeahtta#ráŋggáštuss JOHTOLAT ;
boastto#geavahus+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:boastto#geavahuss JOHTOLAT ;
bovdehus:bovdehuss JOHTOLAT ;
buktin#johtolat:buktin#johtolah'k JOHTOLAT ;
buorrestat:buorrestah'k JOHTOLAT ;
buvttadan#gurgadas:buvttadan#gurgadass JOHTOLAT ;
báhcahat:báhcahah'k JOHTOLAT ;
bárro#guhkkodat:bárro#guhkkodah'k JOHTOLAT ;
bázahus:bázahuss JOHTOLAT ;
dagaldat#čoahkádus:dagaldat#čoahkáduss JOHTOLAT ;
deatnulaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:deatnulažž JOHTOLAT ;
differensiál#giddehat+Use/Sub:differensi^ál#giddehah'k JOHTOLAT ;
diŋgon#buvttadus:diŋgon#buvttaduss JOHTOLAT ;
doavtter#bálvalus:doavtter#bálvaluss JOHTOLAT ;
duiskalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:duiskalažž JOHTOLAT ;
durde#lasáhus:durde#lasáhuss JOHTOLAT ;
dákte#luottohat+Use/Sub:dákte#luottohah'k JOHTOLAT ;
dánskalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:dánskalažž JOHTOLAT ;
dásádat:dásádah'k JOHTOLAT ;
eallin#agi#ásodat+Build:eallin#agi#ásodah'k JOHTOLAT ;
eana#girje#lávadat:eana#girje#lávadah'k JOHTOLAT ;
eanan#láigo#šiehtadus:eanan#láigo#šiehtaduss JOHTOLAT ;
elfápmo#doaimmahat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG+Org+Plc:elfápmo#doaimmahah'k JOHTOLAT ;
evttohas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:evttohass JOHTOLAT ;
fievridan#johtolat+Use/Sub:fievridan#johtolah'k JOHTOLAT ;
fitnodat#dearvvašvuođa#fuolahus:fitnodat#dearvvašvuođa#fuolahuss JOHTOLAT ;
fuođđo#riggodat:fuođđo#riggodah'k JOHTOLAT ;
fápmo#válddahat:fápmo#válddahah'k JOHTOLAT ;
gaska#gažaldat:gaska#gažaldah'k JOHTOLAT ;
geavahan#viidodat:geavahan#viidodah'k JOHTOLAT ;
gierdo#mihtádas:gierdo#mihtádass JOHTOLAT ;
golgolaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:golgolažž JOHTOLAT ;
govvádus+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:govváduss JOHTOLAT ;
guorahat:guorahah'k JOHTOLAT ;
gáibádus+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:gáibáduss JOHTOLAT ;
gávppašeaddji#vuoládus:gávppašeaddji#vuoláduss JOHTOLAT ;
hoigan#heivehus:hoigan#heivehuss JOHTOLAT ;
hárjehallan#vuogádat:hárjehallan#vuogádah'k JOHTOLAT ;
ivdne#vuogádat:ivdne#vuogádah'k JOHTOLAT ;
johtolat:johtolah'k JOHTOLAT ;
juvla#heaŋggastat:juvla#heaŋggastah'k JOHTOLAT ;
kássa#biepmohas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:kássa#biepmohass JOHTOLAT ;
lihkadan#hástalus:lihkadan#hástaluss JOHTOLAT ;
loahppa#dajaldat:loahppa#dajaldah'k JOHTOLAT ;
luodda#mearrádus:luodda#mearráduss JOHTOLAT ;
láhka#njuolggadus:láhka#njuolggaduss JOHTOLAT ;
lávvolat:lávvolah'k JOHTOLAT ;
mearal#vuoládus:mearal#vuoláduss JOHTOLAT ;
miel#ovddas#vástádus:miel#ovddas#vástáduss JOHTOLAT ;
mudden#vuogádat:mudden#vuogádah'k JOHTOLAT ;
mátke#ealáhus:mátke#ealáhuss JOHTOLAT ;
njuolggadus:njuolggaduss JOHTOLAT ;
oahppa#duođaštus:oahppa#duođaštuss JOHTOLAT ;
oanádus+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:oanáduss JOHTOLAT ;
olggos#šávahat:olggos#šávahah'k JOHTOLAT ;
orustan#áigodat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Time:orustan#áigodah'k JOHTOLAT ;
ozolaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:ozolažž JOHTOLAT ;
ravdalas:ravdalass JOHTOLAT ; 
rievdadan#evttohus:rievdadan#evttohuss JOHTOLAT ;
ráfáiduhttin#njuolggadus:ráfáiduhttin#njuolggaduss JOHTOLAT ;
sadjásaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:sadjásažž JOHTOLAT ;
siejahas:siejahass JOHTOLAT ;
soabahan#evttohus:soabahan#evttohuss JOHTOLAT ;
standárda#sturrodat:standárda#sturrodah'k JOHTOLAT ;
sykkel#johtolat#fierpmádat+Org:sykkel#johtolat#fierpmádah'k JOHTOLAT ;
unnimus#ealáhat:unnimus#ealáhah'k JOHTOLAT ;
vearro#geahpádus:vearro#geahpáduss JOHTOLAT ;
virge#njuolggadus:virge#njuolggaduss JOHTOLAT ;
vuoste#evttohus:vuoste#evttohuss JOHTOLAT ;
váhnen#ovddas#vástádus:váhnen#ovddas#vástáduss JOHTOLAT ;
várre#suodjalan#bálvalus:várre#suodjalan#bálvaluss JOHTOLAT ;
áige#gaskkadat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Time:áige#gaskkadah'k JOHTOLAT ;
ámmát#čehppodat:ámmát#čehppodah'k JOHTOLAT ;
ášše#meannudan#meattáhus:ášše#meannudan#meattáhuss JOHTOLAT ;
šiehtadallan#fáladat:šiehtadallan#fáladah'k JOHTOLAT ;
čohkkehus+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:čohkkehuss JOHTOLAT ;
čuohti+N+Attr:čuoh'te ATTR ; ! imprecise number
čuoččuhus:čuoččuhuss JOHTOLAT ;
boazo#doallo#hálddahus+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub+Org+Plc:boazo#doalo#hálddahuss JOHTOLAT ;
